Delaware, session 153, SB149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 81, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Subchapter IV. Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Properties Â§ 8161. Definitions. For purposes of this subchapter: (1) âAnnual revenueâ means the sum reported as total net revenue on the DSHA Statement of Profit and Loss, including the sum of a LIHTC propertyâs total rent revenue, total financial revenue, and total other revenue. (2) âDSHAâ means the Delaware State Housing Authority. (3) âLow-Income Housing Tax Creditâ or âLIHTCâ means tax credits allocated by the DSHA under the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986, 26 U.S.C. Â§ 42. (4) âLIHTC propertyâ means affordable housing that is financed using LIHTC funds and the property remains subject to the affordability controls for rent and income limits established under the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986, 26 U.S.C. Â§ 42. Â§ 8162. Tax exemption; payment in lieu of taxes. (a) A county or municipality may, by ordinance, exempt LIHTC properties from taxation for public purposes. This exemption from taxation must require all of the following: (1) A LIHTC property must be in compliance with all applicable LIHTC requirements. (2) A LIHTC property must apply for the exemption in the same manner as required for other exemptions. (3) A LIHTC property that is exempt from taxation make an annual payment equal to 5% of the LIHTC propertyâs annual revenue for the propertyâs most recent fiscal year. (b) The sum collected under this section from a LIHTC property is divided between political subdivisions having authority to levy taxes on the LIHTC propertyâs land and improvements in proportion to the respective tax rates. Â§ 8163. Collection; penalties. (a) The receiver of taxes and county treasurer shall collect payments under Â§ 8162 of this title in the same manner and at the same time as provided for the collection of taxes under Chapter 80 of this title. (b) A penalty on the unpaid balance may accrue and be due to the county at a rate and in a manner set by ordinance. The county may establish procedures for the abatement of this penalty. Section 2. Amend Â§ 8106A, Title 9 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8106A. New Castle County property tax exemptions; applications; refunds. (a)(1) This section applies to property in New Castle County that is entitled to an exemption as any of the following: f. A Low-Income Housing Tax Credit property under an ordinance enacted under subchapter IV of Chapter 81 of this title. Section 3. Amend Â§ 1902, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1902. Power of district to levy taxes for school purposes. (a) Any district may, in addition to the amounts apportioned to it by the Department of Education or appropriated to it by the General Assembly, levy and collect additional taxes for school purposes upon the assessed value of all taxable real estate in the district, except any of the following: (9) Real estate exempt from taxation as a Low-Income Housing Tax Credit property under an ordinance enacted under subchapter IV of Chapter 81 of Title 9.